Utah statutes.
31A-5-219.   Amendment of articles.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (3) and to the requirements of the Insurance Code, a stock corporation may amend its articles under Sections 16-10a-1001 through  16-10a-1009 and a mutual may amend its articles under Sections 16-6a-1001 through 16-6a-1005 in any manner, including substantial changes of its original purposes.  No amendment may be made contrary to Subsections 31A-5-203(1) through (3).

(2)  An amendment becomes effective when the properly adopted and filed articles of amendment are approved by the commissioner.

(3)  Section 16-10a-1009 applies to stock corporations and the second paragraph of Section 16-6a-1009 applies to mutuals.

